New York, session 2025-2026, A8114.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2 of chapter 405 of the laws of 2005 amending the 2 tax law relating to authorizing the county of Albany to impose a county 3 recording tax on obligations secured by a mortgage on real property, as 4 amended by chapter 338 of the laws of 2023, is amended to read as 5 follows: 6 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 7 have become a law and shall expire and be deemed repealed on the first 8 of December, [2025] 2027. 9 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD11704-02-5